District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-907.01

Establishment of Fund.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 701
as added June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-138, § 2(f), 37 DCR 2638
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9067(b), 58 DCR 6226
1981 Ed., § 33-571.
Mayor to implement public information program: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 48-901.02.